en: Meatloafs
fr: Pains de viande
hr: Mesne štruce
ja: ミートローフ
nl: Vleesbrood

en: Frikadelle
de: Frikadellen
fr: Frikadelles

en: Frikandel
fr: Fricadelles, fricandelles
hr: Frikandel
ja: フリカデレ
nl: Frikandel

en: Vegetarian balls
fr: Boulettes végétariennes
hr: Vegetarijanske kuglice
it: Polpette vegetali
lt: Vegetariški kukuliai
nl: Vegetarische balletjes
pl: Wegetariańskie pulpety

en: Frozen vegetarian balls
fr: Boulettes végétariennes surgelées

en: Balls from soy and or wheat proteins
fr: Boulettes à base de protéines de soja et ou blé
hr: Kuglice od sojinih i/ili pšeničnih proteina
lt: Kukuliai iš sojų ir arba kviečių baltymų

en: Falafels, Falafel
bg: Фалафели
de: Falafel
es: Falafel
fi: falafelit
fr: Falafels, falafel, Boulettes aux pois-chiche et aux fèves frites
hr: Falafeli
it: Falafel
ja: ファラフェル
nl: Falafel

en: Refrigerated falafel
es: Falafel refrigerado
fr: Falafels réfrigérés, Falafel réfrigérés, Falafel réfrigéré
hr: Ohlađeni falafel
it: Falafel congelato
nl: Gekoelde falafel

en: Frozen falafel
es: Falafel congelado
fr: Falafels surgelés, Falafel surgelé
hr: Smrznuti falafel
nl: Diepvriesfalafel

en: Meat balls
bg: Кюфтета от месо
de: Fleischbällchen
fi: Lihapullat, Lihapyörykät
fr: Boulettes de viande
hr: Mesne okruglice
ja: ミートボール
lt: Mėsos kukuliai
nl: Gehaktballen
pt: Almôndegas

en: Small meat balls
hr: Male mesne okruglice
lt: Maži mėsos kukuliai
nl: Soepballetjes

en: Chicken meat balls
bg: Пилешки кюфтета
fr: Boulettes au poulet
hr: Pileće mesne okruglice
ja: 鶏肉のミートボール
lt: Vištienos kukuliai
nl: Kippegehaktballen

en: Pork meat balls
bg: Свински кюфтета
fr: Boulettes au porc
hr: Svinjske ćufte
ja: 豚肉のミートボール
lt: Kiaulienos kukuliai
nl: Varkensgehaktballen

en: Beef meat balls
bg: Говежди кюфтета
fr: Boulettes au bœuf
hr: Goveđe mesne okruglice
ja: 牛肉のミートボール
lt: Jautienos kukuliai
nl: Runder soepballetjes

en: Cooked beef meat balls
fr: Boulettes au boeuf cuites
hr: Mesne okruglice od kuhane govedine
lt: Kepti jautienos kukuliai

en: Beef meat balls with tomato sauce
fr: Boulettes au bœuf à la sauce tomate
hr: Goveđe mesne okruglice s umakom od rajčice
lt: Jautienos kukuliai su pomidorų padažu

en: Swedish-style pork and beef meat balls
fr: Boulettes au porc et au bœuf à la suédoise
hr: Mesne okruglice od svinjetine i govedine na švedski način
lt: Švediško stiliaus kiaulienos ir jautienos kukuliai

en: Kefta, beef and lamb meat balls
fr: Kefta, Boulettes au bœuf et à l'agneau
hr: Kefta
ja: ケフタ
lt: Kefta, jautienos ir ėrienos kukuliai

en: Frozen meat balls
fr: Boulettes de viande surgelées

en: Beef, Beef meat
bg: Говеждо
ca: Bou, carn de bou
da: Okse, oksekød
de: Rind, Rindfleisch
es: Carne de vaca
fi: naudanliha
fr: Bœuf, Viande de bœuf, Viande bovine
he: בשר בקר
hr: Govedina
hu: Marhahús
it: Manzo
ja: 牛肉, ビーフ, ぎゅうにく, ぎゅう肉, 牛にく
lt: Jautiena, Jautienos mėsa
nl: Rund, Rundervlees
pl: Wołowina, mięso wołowe
pt: Carnes de vaca
ru: Говядина
zh: 牛肉